pt-PT: Área de aplicação do produto de limpeza/desinfetante: Campânula; Tubo interior; Corpo exterior; Tudel; Boquilha; Várias áreas/todo o instrumento; Pistões/válvulas; Válvulas rotativas; Bombas (afinação/vara manual); Invólucro da válvula; Chaves de água/válvulas de cuspo; Outro
fr: Zone d’utilisation prévue du nettoyant/désinfectant: Pavillon; Perce; Corps extérieur; Branche d’embouchure; Embouchure/bec; Zones multiples / instrument entier; Pistons/valves; Cylindres/barillets; Coulisses (d’accord/à main); Bloc pistons; Clés d’eau; Autre
sk-SK: Oblasť určená na použitie čističa/dezinfekčného prostriedku: Ozvučník; Vnútro nástroja; Vonkajšie telo; Úsťová rúrka; Náustok; Viacero oblastí / celý nástroj; Piesty/ventily; Rotačné ventily; Znižce (ladiaci/ručný znižec); Puzdro ventilu; Vodné klapky; Iné
it: Area destinata alla pulizia/disinfezione: Campana; Canneggio; Corpo esterno; Tubo d’imboccatura; Bocchino; Multiarea / Strumento intero; Pistoni/Valvole; Valvole rotative; Coulisse (pompa di intonazione/coulisse); Involucro della valvola; Chiavi dell’acqua/Valvole di sfogo; Altro
sl-SI: Območje, namenjeno čistilu/razkužilu: Odmevnik; Odprtina; Zunanjost ohišja; Ustna cev; Ustnik; Več površin / celoten inštrument; Bati/ventili; Rotacijski ventili; Drsne cevi (uglasitvene/ročne); Ohišje ventila; Vodni ključi/ventili za slino; Drugo
da: Anvendelsesområde for rengørings-/desinfektionsmiddel: Klangstykke; Boring; Udvendigt korpus; Mundrør; Mundstykke; Flere områder / hele instrumentet; Stempler/ventiler; Drejeventiler; Træk (stemmetræk/håndtræk); Ventilhus; Vandklapper; Andet
ro-RO: Zona destinată curățării/dezinfectantului: Pavilion; Alezaj/Interior; Corp exterior; Țeavă de suflu; Muștiuc; Zone multiple / întregul instrument; Pistoane/supape; Supape rotative; Culisante (de acordaj/de mână); Carcasă supapă; Clape de apă/supape de condens; Altele
bg-BG: Зона, предназначена за почистване/дезинфекция: Камбана; Отвор; Външен корпус; Основна тръба; Мундщук; Много зони / целия инструмент; Бутала/клапани; Роторни клапани; Кронове/плъзгачи; Корпус на клапаните; Клапи за вода/слюнка; Друго
pt-BR: Área de aplicação do produto de limpeza/desinfetante: Campana; Parte interna do tubo; Corpo exterior; Tudel; Boquilha; Várias áreas / instrumento inteiro; Pistões/válvulas; Válvulas rotativas; Pompas (de afinação/vara); Camisa do pistão; Chaves de água/válvulas de cuspe; Outro
sv: Avsett område för rengöring/desinfektion: Klockstycke; Borrning; Utsida; Munrör; Munstycke; Flera områden / hela instrumentet; Pistonger/ventiler; Cylinder-/rotationsventiler; Byglar (stämbygel/drag); Ventilhus; Vattenklaffar; Annat
el: Περιοχή που προορίζεται για καθαριστικό/απολυμαντικό: Καμπάνα; Εσωτερικός σωλήνας; Εξωτερικό σώμα; Σωλήνας επιστομίου (Leadpipe); Επιστόμιο; Πολλαπλές περιοχές / ολόκληρο το όργανο; Έμβολα/βαλβίδες; Περιστροφικές βαλβίδες; Σύρτες (κουρδίσματος/χεριού); Περίβλημα βαλβίδας; Κλειδιά νερού/βαλβίδες σάλιου; Άλλο
vi: Khu vực cần vệ sinh/khử trùng: Loa kèn; Nòng kèn; Thân ngoài; Ống chính; Ống ngậm; Nhiều khu vực / toàn bộ nhạc cụ; Pít-tông/van; Van xoay; Ống trượt (chỉnh âm/trượt tay); Vỏ van; Nút nhả nước/van xả bọt; Khác
es: Área de uso prevista para el limpiador o desinfectante: Campana; Calibre; Cuerpo exterior; Tudel; Boquilla; Varias áreas / instrumento completo; Pistones/válvulas; Válvulas rotativas; Varas (afinación/vara de mano); Carcasa de las válvulas; Llaves de agua/válvulas de desagüe; Otro
nb: Rengjørings-/desinfeksjonsmiddel tiltenkt område: Klokkestykke; Boring; Utvendig kropp; Munnrør; Munnstykke; Flere områder / hele instrumentet; Stempler / ventiler; Rotasjonsventiler; Bøyler (stemmebøyle / trekk); Ventilhus; Vannklaffer / spyttventiler; Annet
fi: Puhdistusaineelle/desinfiointiaineelle tarkoitettu alue: Kello; Poraus; Ulkopinta; Suuputki; Suukappale; Useita alueita / koko soitin; Männät/venttiilit; Kiertoventtiilit; Luistit (viritys-/käsivetoluisti); Venttiilikotelo; Vesiventtiilit; Muu
hr-HR: Područje namijenjeno za čišćenje/dezinfekciju: Ljevkasti završetak; Cijev; Vanjski dio kućišta; Usna cijev; Usnik; Više područja / cijeli instrument; Klipovi/ventili; Rotacijski ventili; Klizne cijevi (za ugađanje / ručne); Kućište ventila; Ispusni ventili za vodu; Ostalo
ja: 洗浄剤／消毒剤使用対象エリア: ベル; ボア; ボディ外装; マウスパイプ; マウスピース; 複数箇所 / 楽器全体; ピストン/バルブ; ロータリーバルブ; スライド (チューニング管/ハンドスライド); バルブケーシング; ウォーターキイ/つば抜き; その他
zh-TW: 清潔劑/消毒劑適用部位: 揚音管; 內管; 樂器外部; 吹口管; 吹嘴; 多區域/整把樂器; 活塞/活門; 轉閥; 滑管 (調音/手拉滑管); 活塞套管; 排水鍵; 其他
lt-LT: Valiklio / dezinfekavimo priemonės numatyta sritis: Žiobtas; Vamzdis; Išorinis korpusas; Pagrindinis vamzdis; Pūstukas; Kelios sritys / visas instrumentas; Stūmokliai / vožtuvai; Rotaciniai vožtuvai; Slankmačiai (derinimo / rankiniai); Vožtuvų korpusas; Vandens nuleidimo vožtuvai; Kita
th: พื้นที่ที่ต้องการใช้ผลิตภัณฑ์ทำความสะอาด/ฆ่าเชื้อ: ลำโพง; ท่อลม; ตัวเครื่องภายนอก; ท่อลมเข้า; ปากเป่า; หลายพื้นที่ / เครื่องดนตรีทั้งชิ้น; ลูกสูบ/วาล์ว; โรตารีวาล์ว; สไลด์ (ปรับแต่งเสียง/สไลด์มือ); กระบอกวาล์ว; ปุ่มปล่อยน้ำ/วาล์วระบายน้ำ; อื่นๆ
en: Cleaner/sanitizer intended area: Bell; Bore; Exterior body; Leadpipe; Mouthpiece; Multi-area / whole instrument; Pistons/valves; Rotary valves; Slides (tuning/hand slide); Valve casing; Water keys/spit valves; Other
de: Vorgesehener Einsatzbereich des Reinigungs- bzw. Desinfektionsmittels: Becher; Bohrung; Äußerer Korpus; Mundrohr; Mundstück; Mehrere Bereiche / Gesamtes Instrument; Pumpen/Ventile; Drehventile; Züge (Stimmzug/Handzug); Ventilgehäuse; Wasserklappen; Sonstige
tr: Temizleyici/dezenfektan kullanım alanı: Kalak; İç boru; Dış gövde; Ağızlık borusu; Ağızlık; Çoklu alan / tüm enstrüman; Piston/valfler; Döner valfler; Sürgüler (akort/el sürgüsü); Valf yuvası; Su perdeleri/tükürük valfleri; Diğer
pl: Docelowy obszar środka czyszczącego/dezynfekującego: Czara głosowa; Kanał; Zewnętrzna powierzchnia instrumentu; Rurka ustnikowa; Ustnik; Wiele obszarów / cały instrument; Tłoki / wentyle; Wentyle obrotowe; Krągliki (suwaki strojeniowe / ręczne); Komora wentyli; Klapy wodne / kraniki; Inny
nl: Reiniger/desinfectiemiddel bedoeld gebied: Beker; Boring; Behuizing buitenkant; Mondpijp; Mondstuk; Meerdere gebieden / hele instrument; Ventielen; Cilinderventielen; Schuiven (stemschuif/handschuif); Ventielhuis; Waterkleppen; Anders
ru: Область применения очистителя/санитайзера: Раструб; Канал; Внешний корпус; Мундштучная трубка; Мундштук; Несколько зон / весь инструмент; Помпы / клапаны; Вентили (роторные); Кроны (настроечные / кулиса); Корпус клапанов; Сливные клапаны; Другое
zh-CN: 清洁剂/消毒剂适用区域: 喇叭口; 内膛; 外部琴身; 吹口管; 笛头/号嘴; 多区域/整个乐器; 活塞/按键; 旋转阀; 滑管（调音管/手滑管）; 阀壳; 水键/放水阀; 其他
cs: Prostor určený k použití čisticího/dezinfekčního prostředku: Ozvěna; Vrtání; Vnější tělo; Ústnice; Hubička / nátrubek; Více oblastí / celý nástroj; Písty/ventily; Rotační ventily; Snížce (ladicí/ruční snížec); Pouzdro ventilu; Vodní klapky; Jiné
hu: Tisztító/fertőtlenítő rendeltetési területe: Tölcsér; Belső furat; Külső test; Fúvócső; Fúvóka; Több terület / teljes hangszer; Dugattyúk/szelepek; Forgószelepek; Tolócsövek (hangoló-/vonócső); Szelepház; Vízbillentyűk/nyálszelepek; Egyéb
ko: 세척제/살균제 사용 부위: 벨; 보어; 외부 바디; 리드파이프; 마우스피스; 다중 영역/악기 전체; 피스톤/밸브; 로터리 밸브; 슬라이드(튜닝/핸드 슬라이드); 밸브 케이싱; 워터 키/스핏 밸브; 기타